Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,153
Sections; not limiting or restrictive.

The enumeration in sections 25-21,150, 25-21,151 and 25-21,152 does not limit or restrict the exercise of the general powers conferred in section 25-21,149, in any proceeding where declaratory relief is sought, in which a judgment or decree will terminate the controversy or remove an uncertainty.

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 5, p. 258;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,144;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,153.

Coverage under public liability policy could be determined. Hawkeye Casualty Co. v. Stoker, 154 Neb. 466, 48 N.W.2d 623 (1951).

Affirmative relief against items of state taxation is authorized. Mid-Continent Airlines v. Nebraska State Board of Equalization and Assessment, 105 F.Supp. 188 (D. Neb. 1952).